District of Columbia statutes.
20-323

Notice of request for standard probate; form.

(a)

When given. —

A person filing a petition for standard probate shall promptly give notice to all known interested persons. In addition, the petitioner shall publish a notice once a week for 2 successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the District of Columbia and in any other publication the Court may provide by Rule.

(b)

Form of notice. —

The notice required by this section shall be in the form prescribed by the Rules.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
This section is referenced in § 20-311 and § 20-321.
1981 Ed., § 20-323.